src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! # The Hungarian morphophonological/twolc rules file 
!! =================================== !

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-hun/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

!! ## Alphabets and sets

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z !!= * @CODE@ 
 á é ó ú í ö ü ő ű !!=   @CODE@ 
 æ ø å à è ò ù ì ä ë ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç !!=   @CODE@ 

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z !!= * @CODE@ 
 Á É Ó Ú Í Ö Ü Ő Ű !!=  @CODE@ 
 Æ Ø Å À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý Þ Ñ Ð ß Ç !!= * @CODE@ 

!! TRIGGERS
%{back%}:0 !!= * @CODE@ 
%{front%}:0 !!= * @CODE@ 
%^Ö2:0		!!= * @CODE@ h%^Ö2z
%^V2:0		!!= * @CODE@ %^V2al 
%^Hist:0         !!= * @CODE@ historic documents
%^Pen:0		!!= * @CODE@ penultimate position
%^RmVow:0	!!= * @CODE@ remove vowel
%^V2VV:0	!!= * @CODE@ lengthen vowel
%^VV2V:0	!!= * @CODE@ shorten vowel

!! Archiphones
%{ae%}:a %{ae%}:e !!= * @CODE@ 
%{aeáé%}:a %{aeáé%}:e %{aeáé%}:á %{aeáé%}:é !!= * @CODE@ 
%{áé%}:á %{áé%}:é !!= * @CODE@ 
%{eoö%}:e %{eoö%}:o %{eoö%}:ö !!= * @CODE@ 
%{óő%}:ó %{óő%}:ő !!= * @CODE@ 
%{uü%}:u %{uü%}:ü !!= * @CODE@ 
 %> !!= * @CODE@ 
 ;

!! Sets
Sets

 Vow = a e i o u á é ó ú í ő ű ö ü !!= * @CODE@ 
       A E I O U Á É Ó Ú Í Ő Ű Ö Ü !!=  @CODE@ 
       æ ø å à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý ; !!=  @CODE@ 
 VowAndY = Vow y Y ; !!= * @CODE@ 

 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ð þ  !!= * @CODE@ 
       B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Z Ð Þ ; !!=  @CODE@ 
 
!! ## Rules 
Rules

"Stem-final vowel lengthening"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Vx:Vy <=> _ %^V2VV: %> ;
     where Vx in (a A e E)
           Vy in (á Á é É)
       matched ;
!! béke+N+Sg+PxSg3
!!€ béke%^V2VV%>je
!!€ béké0%>je

"Penultimate Stem vowel shortening"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Vx:Vy <=> _ [ Cns:+ |Cns:+ y ] (%{back%}:|%{front%}:) %^Pen: %^VV2V: ;
      where Vx in (ű Ű ő Ő ú Ú ó Ó é É í Í á Á)
      	    Vy in (ü Ü ö Ö u U o O e E i I a A)
	    matched ;
!! madár+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ madár%^Pen%^VV2V%>ak
!!€ madar00%>ak

"Penultimate and stem-final vowel removal"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 Vx:0 <=> _ [%{back%}:|%{front%}:|Cns:+ (y) (%{back%}:|%{front%}:) %^Pen: ] %^RmVow: ;
      where Vx in (ü Ü ű Ű ö Ö ő Ő u U ú Ú o O ó Ó e E i I a A) ;
!! forradalom+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ forradalom%{back%}%^Pen%^RmVow%>%{ae%}k
!!€ forradal0m000%>ak

!! falu+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ falu%^RmVow%>vak
!!€ fal00%>vak

"Assimilation to stem-final consonant"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 0:Cx <=> Cx (%{back%}:|%{front%}:) _  %> %^V2: ;
     where Cx in (b c d f g j k l m n p r t v) ;

"Assimilation to stem-final consonant followed by y"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 0:Cx <=> Cx _ y (%{back%}:|%{front%}:) %> %^V2: ;
    where Cx in (d l n r t) ;

"Assimilation to stem-final zs cs "
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 0:Cx <=> Cx _ s %> %^V2: ;
      	  Vow ([[Cns:] - [s]]+) Cx (%{back%}:|%{front%}:) _ %> %^V2: ;
    where Cx in (z Z c C) ;

"Assimilation to stem-final sz"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 0:s <=> s _ z (%{back%}:|%{front%}:) %> %^V2: ;
 Vow ([[Cns:] - [c | z]]+) s _ (%{back%}:|%{front%}:) %> %^V2: ;

"v from V2"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %^V2:v <=> [Vow: (%^V2VV:) |:Vow (%^V2VV:) | Cns (y) %^Hist: | v ] (%{back%}:|%{front%}:) %> _ :Vow ;

"%{eoö%} to ö"
 %{eoö%}:ö <=>
! [%{front%}:  \[ #  | %{back%}: ]* [:ö | :ü |:ő | :ű] Cns:* |[:ö | :ü |:ő | :ű] (Cns:+ ) %{front%}:] %> (%^Ö2: ) Cns: _ Cns  ;
            [%{front%}:  \[ #  | %{back%}: ]* [:ö | :ü |:ő | :ű] Cns:+ |[:ö | :ü |:ő | :ű] Cns:+ %{front%}:] _ [n |m | d | t |k]  ;

"%{eoö%} to e"
 %{eoö%}:e <=>
! [%{front%}:  \[ #  | %{back%}: ]* [:e | :i |:é | :í] Cns:* |[:e | :i |:é | :í] (Cns:+ ) %{front%}:] %> (%^Ö2: ) Cns: _ Cns  ;
            [%{front%}:  \[ #  | %{back%}: ]* [:e | :i |:é | :í] Cns:+ | [:e | :i |:é | :í] Cns:+ %{front%}:] _ [n |m | d | t|k]  ;
!! fül+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2
!!€ fül%{front%}%>%{ae%}t%{eoö%}k
!!€ fül0%>etek

"%{eoö%} to o"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{eoö%}:o <=> %{back%}: \[ #  | %{front%}: ]* _ ; 


"low vowel variation a e back"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{ae%}:a <=> %{back%}: \[ #  | %{front%}: ]* _ ;
!!€ ház%{back%}%>b%{ae%}n
!!€ ház0%>ban

!!$ ház%{back%}%>b%{ae%}n
!!$ ház0%>ben

"low vowel variation a e front short"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{ae%}:e <=> %{front%}: \[ #  | %{back%}: ]* _  ;



"low vowel variation a e á é back short"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{aeáé%}:a <=> %{back%}: \[ #  | %{front%}: ]* _ [#| %> ] ;

"low vowel variation a e á é back long"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{aeáé%}:á <=> %{back%}: \[ #  | %{front%}: ]* _ %^V2VV: ;

"low vowel variation a e á é front short"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{aeáé%}:e <=> %{front%}: \[ #  | %{back%}: ]* _ [#| %> ] ;

"low vowel variation a e á é front long"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{aeáé%}:é <=> %{front%}: \[ #  | %{back%}: ]* _ %^V2VV: ;


"long mid vowel variation ó ő back "
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{óő%}:ó <=> %{back%}: \[ #  | %{front%}: ]* _  ;

"long mid vowel variation ó ő front "
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{óő%}:ő <=> %{front%}: \[ #  | %{back%}: ]* _  ;

"long high vowel variation u ü back "
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{uü%}:u <=> %{back%}: \[ #  | %{front%}: ]* _  ;

"long high vowel variation u ü front "
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@** 
 %{uü%}:ü <=> %{front%}: \[ #  | %{back%}: ]* _  ;
